West Virginia, session 2025, HB3302.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 5. Miscellaneous provisions. §9-5-34. Contracts for distributions to homeless shelters. All entities who contract with the State of West Virginia to administer and distribute funds for homeless shelters shall have a board of directors consisting of one representative from each region of West Virginia.